Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.030

Contributions by firefighters.

Every firefighter to whom this chapter applies shall contribute to the firefighters' pension fund a sum equal to six percent of his or her basic salary which shall be deducted therefrom and placed in the fund.

[ 2007 c 218 s 44; 1961 c 255 s 2; 1955 c 382 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.